Tennessee statutes. Title 15 Holidays and Days of Special Observance
Chapter 1

Holidays

15-1-101. Legal holidays.

January 1; the third Monday in January, “Martin Luther King, Jr. Day”; the third Monday in February, known as “Washington Day”; the last Monday in May, known as “Memorial” or “Decoration Day”; July 4; the first Monday in September, known as “Labor Day”; the second Monday in October, known as “Columbus Day”; November 11, known as “Veterans' Day”; the fourth Thursday in November, known as “Thanksgiving Day”; December 25; and Good Friday; and when any one (1) of these days falls on Sunday, then the following Monday shall be substituted; and when any of these days falls on Saturday, then the preceding Friday shall be substituted; also, all days appointed by the governor or by the president of the United States as days of fasting or thanksgiving, and all days set apart by law for holding county, state, or national elections, throughout this state, are made legal holidays, and the period from twelve o'clock (12:00) noon to twelve o'clock (12:00) midnight of each Saturday which is not a holiday is made a half-holiday, on which holidays and half-holidays all public offices of this state may be closed and business of every character, at the option of the parties in interest of the same, may be suspended.

Acts 1889, ch. 63, § 1; 1891, ch. 48, § 1; 1899, ch. 94, § 85; 1899, ch. 156, § 1; 1899, ch. 162, § 1; 1903, ch. 136, § 1; Shan., § 3515; Acts 1917, ch. 86, § 1; 1919, ch. 28, § 1; 1919, ch. 34, § 1; 1921, ch. 73, § 1; mod. Code 1932, § 7520; Acts 1937, ch. 164, § 1; 1937, ch. 169, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7520 (Williams, §§ 7520, 7520.3); impl. am. Acts 1953, ch. 91; impl. am. Act of Congress, June 1, 1954, ch. 250; Acts 1969, ch. 166, § 1; 1973, ch. 23, § 1; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 55-101; Acts 1984, ch. 979, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1984, ch. 979, §§ 2, 3 provided that the governor choose one or more of the present legal holidays established in this section which shall be deleted upon their designation by the governor, the intent of the 1984 amendment being that the chief executive could select two days in any one year to apply for a two-year period where overall there would be no more than one set aside over a two-year period. The governor chose the election day holiday for the August and November elections. Time-off for voting by state employees is now governed by §2-1-106.

Cross-References. Business day defined to exclude certain holidays, §47-18-702.

Days of special observance, title 15, ch. 2.

Free sport fishing day, §70-2-109.

State offices closed on legal holidays, §4-4-105.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 12.22.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Landlord and Tenant, § 10; 23 Tenn. Juris., Sundays and Holidays, §§ 3, 6.

Attorney General Opinions. Holidays on which county offices may be closed, OAG 98-058, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 58 (3/9/98).

15-1-102. Friday holidays — Optional suspension of Saturday business.

Whenever January 1, July 4 or December 25 falls on Friday, then any corporation, firm or individual shall, on the succeeding Saturday, have the privilege and option to suspend business activities completely or partially and shall not incur any liability for failure to exercise on such a Saturday all of the lawful functions authorized by law; provided, that nothing herein shall be construed to compel any corporation, firm or individual to suspend lawful business functions on such a Saturday, as it is optional whether this right is exercised.

Acts 1943, ch. 15, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7521.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 55-103.

15-1-103. Banks — Optional Saturday business.

Nothing in any law shall in any manner affect the validity of, or render void or voidable, the payment, certification, or acceptance of a check or other negotiable instrument or any other transaction by a bank in this state, because done or performed on any legal holiday or on any Saturday between twelve o'clock (12:00) noon and twelve o'clock (12:00) midnight; provided, that such payment, certification, acceptance, or other transaction would be valid if done or performed on any business day other than a legal holiday, or if done or performed before twelve o'clock (12:00) noon on such Saturday. Nothing herein shall be construed to compel any bank, which by law or custom is entitled to close on a legal holiday, or is entitled to close at twelve o'clock (12:00) noon on any Saturday, to keep open for the transaction of business or to perform any of these acts or transactions on any legal holiday or on any Saturday after twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, except at its own option.

Acts 1919, ch. 18, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3515a1; mod. Code 1932, § 7521; Acts 1939, ch. 86, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7521; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 55-102.

15-1-104. Banks — Optional suspension of Wednesday, Thursday, or Saturday morning business.

Every corporation, firm or individual doing a banking business in this state has the privilege and option to suspend business activities completely or partially on Wednesday, Thursday or Saturday mornings of each week and shall not incur any liability for failure then to exercise all of the lawful functions authorized by law; provided, that nothing herein shall be construed to compel any corporation, firm or individual doing a banking business in this state to suspend lawful functions on Wednesday, Thursday or Saturday mornings of each week.

Acts 1949, ch. 187, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7521.2; Acts 1953, ch. 175, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 55-104.